New York, session 2025-2026, S8750.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. (a) There is hereby established a fiscal cliff task force 2 to study fiscal cliffs in the state's public assistance programs and 3 make recommendations on how to reduce and eliminate such fiscal cliffs. 4 For the purposes of this section, the term "fiscal cliff" shall mean a 5 sudden decrease in public benefits that can occur with a small increase 6 in earnings. 7 (b) (i) The task force shall consist of nineteen members, each to 8 serve for a term ending December 31, 2028. Such members shall be 9 appointed as follows: two members shall be appointed by the temporary 10 president of the senate; one member shall be appointed by the minority 11 leader of the senate; two members shall be appointed by the speaker of 12 the assembly; one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of 13 the assembly; five members shall be appointed by the governor; three 14 local social services district commissioners or their designees having 15 relevant experience in administering public benefits shall be appointed 16 by the governor, of which one district shall have five million or more 17 inhabitants; the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability 18 assistance or their designee; the commissioner of health or their desig- 19 nee; the commissioner of taxation and finance or their designee; the 20 commissioner of the department of labor or their designee; the commis- 21 sioner of the office of children and family services or their designee. 22 Appointments shall be made within sixty days of the effective date of 23 this section. Vacancies in the task force shall be filled in the manner 24 provided for original appointments. 25 (ii) All appointments shall be coordinated to ensure geographic repre- 26 sentation from the entire state. 27 (iii) The task force shall elect a chair, vice-chair, and other neces- 28 sary officers from among all appointed members. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00920-02-6 S. 8750 2 1 (iv) A majority of the members of the task force then in office shall 2 constitute a quorum for the transaction of business or the exercise of 3 any power or function of the task force. An act, determination or deci- 4 sion of the majority of the members present during the presence of a 5 quorum shall be held to be the act, determination, or decision of the 6 task force. 7 (v) The task force shall meet at least quarterly at the call of the 8 chair. Meetings may be held via teleconference. Special meetings may be 9 called by the chair at the request of a majority of the members of the 10 task force. 11 (vi) Members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their 12 services but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in 13 the performance of their duties in the work of the task force. 14 (c) The task force shall: 15 (i) conduct a study on the fiscal cliffs in the state. Such study 16 shall include, but not be limited to: public assistance programs; the 17 supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP); the home energy 18 assistance program (HEAP); housing assistance; the child care tax credit 19 and other tax credits; the school tax relief program (STAR) and other 20 real property tax credits and reductions; Medicaid; NY state of health, 21 the official health plan marketplace; child care subsidies tied to 22 income; cash benefits; effective tax rates; and any other program or 23 service provided by the state or any political subdivision thereof which 24 is tied to income; 25 (ii) study the causes and reasons why fiscal cliffs occur to individ- 26 uals on public benefits, including but not limited to, the impact of 27 current public assistance programs monetary allotments, asset tests, 28 asset limits, and income disregards, as well as how minimum wage and 29 other earnings may impact those receiving public benefits; and 30 (iii) recommend ways to reduce and/or eliminate fiscal cliffs includ- 31 ing, but not limited to, recommending program and policy modifications, 32 amendments to the law, including but not limited to possible changes in 33 calculating and paying the earned income tax credit or other tax cred- 34 its, changes to the New York codes, rules and regulations, and any other 35 recommendation the task force deems appropriate. 36 (d) The task force may, as it deems appropriate, request that studies, 37 surveys, or analyses relating to the task force's powers and duties be 38 performed by any state department, commission, agency or public authori- 39 ty. All state departments, commissions, agencies or public authorities 40 shall provide information and advice in a timely manner and otherwise 41 assist the task force with its work. 42 (e) The office of temporary and disability assistance shall provide 43 staff services to the task force and such other administrative assist- 44 ance as may be necessary for the task force to carry out its duties, 45 functions and powers. 46 (f) The task force shall make a preliminary report to the governor and 47 the legislature of its findings, conclusions, recommendations and activ- 48 ities already undertaken by the task force, not later than January 1, 49 2028, and a final report of its findings, conclusions, recommendations 50 and activities already undertaken by the task force, not later than 51 September 1, 2028 and shall submit with its reports legislative 52 proposals as it deems necessary to implement its recommendations. 53 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire three 54 years after it shall have become a law when upon such date the 55 provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed.